Connecticut, session 2026, SB00234.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (c) of section 14-36 of the 2026 supplement to
the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(c) (1) A person who is sixteen or seventeen years of age and who has
not had a motor vehicle operator's license or right to operate a motor
vehicle in this state suspended or revoked may apply to the
commissioner for a youth instruction permit. The commissioner may
issue a youth instruction permit to an applicant after the applicant has
(A) passed a test as to knowledge of the laws concerning motor vehicles
and the rules of the road, (B) paid the fee required by subsection (v) of
section 14-49, (C) passed a vision screening conducted by the
Department of Motor Vehicles or submitted to the commissioner the
results of a vision examination conducted by a licensed medical
professional, as defined in section 14-46b, that certifies that the applicant
meets the vision standards established in regulations adopted pursuant
to section 14-45a, and (D) filed a certificate, in such form as the
commissioner prescribes, requesting or consenting to the issuance of the
youth instruction permit and the motor vehicle operator's license,
signed by (i) one or both parents or foster parents of the applicant, as
LCO 1 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 234
the commissioner requires, (ii) the legal guardian of the applicant, (iii)
the applicant's spouse, if the spouse is eighteen years of age or older, or
(iv) if the applicant has no qualified spouse and such applicant's parent
or foster parent or legal guardian is deceased, incapable, domiciled
outside of this state or otherwise unavailable or unable to sign or file the
certificate, the applicant's stepparent, grandparent, or uncle or aunt by
blood or marriage, provided such person is eighteen years of age or
older. The commissioner may, for the more efficient administration of
the commissioner's duties, appoint any drivers' school licensed in
accordance with the provisions of section 14-69 or any secondary school
providing instruction in motor vehicle operation and highway safety in
accordance with section 14-36e to issue a youth instruction permit,
subject to such standards and requirements as the commissioner may
prescribe in regulations adopted in accordance with the provisions of
chapter 54. Each youth instruction permit shall expire two years from
the date of issuance or on the date the holder of the permit is issued a
motor vehicle operator's license, whichever is earlier. Any holder of a
youth instruction permit who attains eighteen years of age may retain
such permit until the expiration of such permit. (2) The youth
instruction permit shall entitle the holder, while such holder has the
permit in his or her immediate possession, to operate a motor vehicle on
the public highways, provided such holder is under the instruction of,
and accompanied by, a person who holds an instructor's license issued
under the provisions of section 14-73 or a person twenty years of age or
older who has been licensed to operate, for at least four years preceding
the instruction, a motor vehicle of the same class as the motor vehicle
being operated and who has not had his or her motor vehicle operator's
license suspended by the commissioner during the four-year period
preceding the instruction. (3) Unless the holder of the permit is under
the instruction of and accompanied by a person who holds an
instructor's license issued under the provisions of section 14-73, no
passenger in addition to the person providing instruction shall be
transported unless such passenger is either (A) a parent or legal
guardian of the holder of the permit, or (B) a sibling of such holder of
the permit and such sibling also holds a youth instruction permit issued
LCO 2 of 3

Substitute Bill No. 234
under the provisions of this section. (4) The holder of a youth instruction
permit who (A) is an active member of a certified ambulance service, as
defined in section 19a-175, (B) has commenced an emergency vehicle
operator's course that conforms to the national standard curriculum
developed by the United States Department of Transportation, and (C)
has had state and national criminal history records checks conducted by
the certified ambulance service or by the municipality in which such
ambulance service is provided, shall be exempt from the provisions of
subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection only when such holder is
driving to or from the location of the ambulance for purposes of
responding to an emergency call. (5) The commissioner may revoke any
youth instruction permit used in violation of the limitations imposed by
subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 14-36(c)
TRA Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 3 of 3